apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="f/ærttahasj__Pron_Indef">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahadtjan</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahadtjan</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahadtjanga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahadtjanga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahadtjange</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahadtjange</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahadtjangen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahadtjangen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjada</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadak</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagá</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagi</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjada</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadak</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagá</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagi</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadaga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadakga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagága</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagiga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadaga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadakga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagága</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagiga</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadage</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadak</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadakge</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagáge</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagák</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagige</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagik</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadage</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadak</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadakge</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagáge</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagák</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagige</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagik</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadakgen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagágen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttahattjadagigen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadakgen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagágen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttahattjadagigen</l>
          <r>ærttahasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    <e lm="færttahasj"><i>f</i><par n="f/ærttahasj__Pron_Indef"/></e>
